Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2
ADMINISTRATION

42-1-201. Administration - supervisor.

The executive director of the department is empowered to administer and enforce the provisions of articles 1 to 4 of this title. There shall be at least one supervisor who shall be employed under section 13 of article XII of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2106, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1639, § 22, effective June 1.

42-1-202. Have charge of all divisions.

The supervisor shall have charge of all divisions as provided in articles 1 to 4 of this title to carry out the purposes of said articles.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2106, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-1-203. Executive director to cooperate with others - local compliance required.

The executive director of the department shall coordinate motor vehicle enforcement throughout the state by cooperating with other officials connected with traffic enforcement, as may appear to the executive director as advantageous. The executive director shall bring to the attention of proper officials information and statistics in connection with enforcement and shall urge the desirability and necessity of uniformity. It is the executive director's duty to cooperate and confer with officials of other states charged with like duties, and the executive director is authorized to attend conferences called among said officials, and the executive director's necessary traveling expenses in attending said meetings shall be paid as are other traveling expenses of said department.

In the coordination of motor vehicle law enforcement reporting throughout the state, the executive director, upon the failure of any local jurisdiction to take the necessary steps to achieve uniformity, may order such local jurisdiction to come into conformity with state coordination plans, including all information and statistics relating thereto.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2106, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-1-204. Uniform rules and regulations.

The executive director of the department has the power to make uniform rules and regulations not inconsistent with articles 1 to 4 of this title and to enforce the same.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2107, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

42-1-205. Record of official acts - seal.

The executive director of the department shall keep a record of all the executive director's official acts and shall preserve a copy of all decisions, rules, and orders made by the executive director, and the executive director shall adopt an official seal for the department. Copies of any act, rule, order, or decision made by the executive director or of any paper or papers filed in the executive director's office may be authenticated by the executive director or the executive director's deputy under said seal at a cost not exceeding one dollar for each authentication and when so authenticated shall be evidence equally with and in like manner as the originals and may be received by the courts of this state as evidence of the contents.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2107, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Cross references:

For use of a rubber stamp that produces a facsimile of the seal, see § 42-2-121 (3).

42-1-206. Records open to inspection - furnishing of copies - rules.

Except as provided in part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S., and subsection (6) of this section, all records made public records by any provision of this title and kept in the office of the department shall be open to inspection by the public during business hours under such reasonable rules relating thereto as the executive director of the department may prescribe.

For purposes of subsections (1) to (3) and (5) of this section, "law" means the federal "Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994", 18 U.S.C. sec. 2721 et seq., the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681 et seq., part 2 of article 72 of title 24, part 21 of article 30 of title 24, and this section. The department shall prepare a requester release form and make the form available to the department's authorized agents. The form must include the following:

A statement indicating whether the requester will use the motor vehicle or driver records or transfer or resell such records to another person for any purpose prohibited by law;

A warning that any person using motor vehicle or driver records, or obtaining, reselling, or transferring these records, for purposes prohibited by law may be subject to civil or criminal penalties under federal and state law; and

An affidavit of intended use that states that such requester shall not obtain, use, resell, or transfer the information for any purpose prohibited by law.

The department or an authorized agent shall require any person, other than a person in interest as defined in section 24-72-202 (4), C.R.S., or a federal, state, or local government agency carrying out its official functions, requesting inspection of a motor vehicle or driver record from the department or agent individually or in bulk, to sign a requester release form and, under penalty of perjury, an affidavit of intended use prior to providing the record to such person. The department or authorized agent may allow inspection of motor vehicle and driver records only as authorized under section 24-72-204 (7), C.R.S.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, upon written application and the payment of a fee per copy, or a record search for each copy requested, the department shall furnish to any person a photostatic copy of any specified record or accident report specifically made a public record by this title and shall, if requested, certify the same. The department shall set the fee in accordance with section 42-2-114.5. The department shall transfer the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the licensing services cash fund; except that the treasurer shall credit:

(I) Ten cents of each fee collected by the authorized agent to the special purpose account established under section 42-1-211; and

(II) The entire fee for vehicle and manufactured home records, if collected directly by the department, to the special purpose account established under section 42-1-211.

An authorized agent of the department shall not provide the service of furnishing copies of certain records to members of the public if copies of such records are available to the public directly from the department.

Repealed. / (Deleted by amendment,

L. 99, p. 345

, § 3, effective April 16, 1999.)

(3.5) (a) The department shall not sell, permit the sale of, or otherwise release to anyone other than the person in interest any photograph, electronically stored photograph, digitized image, fingerprint, or social security number filed with, maintained by, or prepared by the department of revenue pursuant to section

42-2-121

(2)(c)(I)(F) or (2)(c)(I)(H).

Nothing in this subsection (3.5) shall prevent the department from sharing any information with a criminal justice agency as defined in section

24-72-302 (3)

, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2000, p. 1340

, § 2, effective May 30, 2000.)

The department of revenue shall make every effort to retrieve all copies of photographs, electronically stored photographs, or digitized images that may have been sold by the department under subsection (3), as said subsection existed prior to its repeal in 1999, of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (3.5)(a) of this section or part 3 of article 72 of title 24, the department may transmit the driver or cardholder image from its driver's license and identification card records to the driver licensing agency of any other state for the purposes of identifying driver's license applicants and violators. The department may promulgate rules to implement this provision.

(3.7) (a) The department shall establish a system to allow bulk electronic transfer of information to primary users and vendors who are permitted to receive such information pursuant to section

24-72-204

(7), C.R.S. Bulk transfers to vendors shall be limited strictly to vendors who transfer or resell such information for purposes permitted by law. Such information shall consist of the information contained in a driver's license application under section

42-2-107

, a driver's license renewal application under section

42-2-118

, a duplicate driver's license application under section

42-2-117

, a commercial driver's license application under section

42-2-403

, an identification card application under section

42-2-302

, a motor vehicle title application under section

42-6-116

, a motor vehicle registration application under section

42-3-113

, or other official record or document maintained by the department under section

42-2-121

.

The department shall promulgate rules governing annual contracts with primary users and vendors for the purpose of establishing bulk electronic transfer of information to primary users and vendors pursuant to an annual affidavit and release form and shall require that the contracts include, at a minimum:

A provision for a reasonable fee that encompasses all direct costs of the department related to the bulk electronic transfer of information to that primary user or vendor;

A provision that prohibits any use not otherwise authorized by law;

A provision that requires the primary user or vendor to specify the designated use and recipients of the information; and

A provision that prohibits any resale or transfer of the information other than as specified in the contract or in a manner that is prohibited by law.

Repealed.

The department shall provide bulk electronic transfer in accordance with the limitations and restrictions regarding release of information in this section as well as section

24-72-204

, C.R.S. The department shall not release photographs, electronically stored photographs, digitized images, or fingerprints filed with, maintained by, or prepared by the department through bulk electronic transfer.

The department shall forward all fees collected pursuant to contracts entered into with primary users or vendors pursuant to this subsection (3.7) to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund. The general assembly shall make annual appropriations from the general fund for the costs associated with the administration of this subsection (3.7).

The executive director of the department shall promulgate rules as are consistent with current law and necessary to carry out the provisions of this subsection (3.7).

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in this section, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

A person who willfully and knowingly obtains, resells, transfers, or uses information in violation of law:

Is liable to any injured party for treble damages, reasonable attorney fees, and costs;

Is subject to being denied access to the records by the department. The department may temporarily or permanently deny access to or place restrictions on the access of a person who violates this subsection (5).

The record of conviction and actions taken by the department for violating section 18-13-122 or 44-3-901 (1)(d), held by the department of revenue, shall not be a public record after the period of revocation imposed under such sections has been concluded; except that this subsection (6) shall not prevent the department from sharing such information with a criminal justice agency as defined in section 24-72-302 (3).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2107, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(3) added, p. 1178, § 2, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1051, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 98:

(4) added, p. 1351, § 92, effective June 1.

L. 99:

(3) amended and (3.5) added, p. 345, § 3, effective April 16; (3) repealed and (3.7) added, pp. 1241, 1239, §§ 4, 2, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(1)(b)(I)(A), (2)(a), (3.5)(c), and (3.7)(a) amended, p. 1340, § 2, effective May 30.

L. 2001:

(1)(b), (3.7)(a), IP(3.7)(b), (3.7)(b)(I), and (3.7)(b)(IV) amended and (5) added, p. 587, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1978, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended and (6) added, p. 673, § 1, effective June 1; (3.5)(d) amended, p. 782, § 75, effective June 1; (3.7)(a) amended, p. 1171, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1541, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

(3.5)(e) added, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 359, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(6) amended, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1082, § 22, effective October 1; IP(1)(b)(I), (1)(b)(I)(B), and (5) amended, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1808, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3.7)(c)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (3.7)(c), effective July 1, 2000. (See

L. 99, p. 1239

.)

Cross references:

(1) For public records and the inspection, copying, or photographing thereof, see part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 201, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

42-1-207. No supplies for private purposes - penalty.

No officer or employee at any time shall use for private or pleasure purposes any of the equipment or supplies furnished for the discharge of such officer or employee's duties. The use of such equipment for private or personal use is declared to be a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, the violator shall be punished by a fine of not more than three hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment and by dismissal from office.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2107, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-1-208. Information on accidents - published.

The department shall receive accident reports required to be made by law and shall tabulate and analyze such reports and publish annually, or at more frequent intervals, statistical information based thereon as to the number, cause, and location of highway accidents. The statistical information shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2108, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 30, § 2, effective August 3.

42-1-209. Copies of law published. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2108, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2007:

Entire section repealed, p. 30, § 3, effective August 3.

42-1-210. Authorized agents - legislative declaration - fee.

Authorized agents are hereby designated as the authorized agents of the department, under direction of the executive director of the department, for the administration of articles 1, 3, 4, 6, and 12 of this title and rules adopted under those articles relating to the performance of their duties; for the enforcement of section 42-6-139 relating to the registering and titling of motor vehicles; and for the enforcement of section 38-29-120 relating to the titling of manufactured homes.
(1) (a) (I) Authorized agents are hereby designated as the authorized agents of the department, under direction of the executive director of the department, for the administration of articles 1, 3, 4, 6, and 12 of this title and rules adopted under those articles relating to the performance of their duties; for the enforcement of section 42-6-139 relating to the registering and titling of motor vehicles; and for the enforcement of section 38-29-120 relating to the titling of manufactured homes.

An authorized agent may appoint and employ such motor vehicle registration and license clerks as are actually necessary in the issuance of motor vehicle licenses and may retain for the purpose of defraying these expenses, including mailing, a sum equal to four dollars per paid motor vehicle registration and registration requiring a license plate or plates; individual temporary registration number plates; or a validation tab, sticker, decal, or certificate as provided in sections 42-3-201 and 42-3-203. This fee of four dollars applies to every registration of a motor vehicle except motor vehicles that are specifically exempted from payment of any registration fee by article 3 of this title 42, and is required in addition to the annual registration fee prescribed by law for a motor vehicle. When the department collects the fee, the department shall transfer the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account created in section 42-1-211; except that, if the fee is collected by a third-party provider, the department shall transmit the fee to the authorized agent where the vehicle or special mobile machinery is registered. Authorized agents serve under this part 2 without additional remuneration or fees, except as otherwise provided in articles 1 to 6 of this title 42.

The fee established by subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to a shipping and handling fee for the mailing of a license plate, individual temporary registration number plate, and certificate, decal, or validation tab or sticker pursuant to section 42-3-105 (1)(a).

The general assembly hereby finds that, since it is the government that requires citizens to register, license, and undertake other actions concerning their motor vehicles, it is thus the duty of government to provide convenient and easily accessible motor vehicle services to the public.

An authorized agent is responsible for the preservation of title and registration paperwork processed in the agent's office until each document has been converted to a digital image and verified by the department.

The department is responsible for the preservation of title and registration paperwork digitally stored in Colorado DRIVES.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2108, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1053, § 5, effective September 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 136, § 1, effective March 30; (1) amended, p. 1019, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) amended, p. 824, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 269, § 18, effective November 15.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 562, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1171, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(1)(a) amended, p. 976, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 359, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(II) amended, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1809, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 98-1064 and House Bill 98-1070 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 201, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

42-1-211. Driver's license, record, identification, and vehicle enterprise solution.

The department is hereby authorized to coordinate the management of a statewide system, referred to as Colorado DRIVES. The department shall provide the necessary hardware, software, and support and training to aid the authorized agents in the performance of their duties.

(1.5) and (1.7) Repealed.

(1.9) (a) In accordance with section 24-21-521 (2), the department of revenue and the department of state shall allow for the exchange of information on legal names and signatures between the systems used by the department of revenue and the notary public filing system maintained by the department of state for the purpose of electronic filing of notary applications and renewals.

For purposes of this subsection (1.9), "systems used by the department of revenue" means Colorado DRIVES.

Repealed.

There is hereby created the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account in the highway users tax fund for the purpose of providing funds for the development and operation of Colorado DRIVES, including operations performed under articles 3, 4, 6, 7, and 12 of this title 42, to cover the costs of administration and enforcement of the motorist insurance identification database program created in section 42-7-604, and to purchase and issue license plates, decals, and validating tabs in accordance with article 3 of this title 42. Money received from the fees imposed by section 38-29-138 (1), (2), (4), and (5) and sections 42-1-206 (2)(a), 42-1-231, 42-3-107 (22), 42-3-213 (1)(b)(IV), 42-3-304 (18), 42-3-306 (14), 42-3-313 (2)(c)(I), and 42-6-137 (1), (2), (4), (5), and (6), as well as any money received through gifts, grants, and donations to the account from private or public sources for the purposes of this section, shall be credited by the state treasurer to the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account. The general assembly shall appropriate annually the money in the account for the purposes of this subsection (2). If any unexpended and unencumbered money remains in the account at the end of a fiscal year, the balance remains in the account and is not transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

Repealed.

One employee of the governor's office of information technology who is familiar with the division of motor vehicle systems and process and who is appointed by the executive director of the governor's office of information and technology.

Repealed.

There is hereby created the Colorado DRIVES county governance committee. The committee consists of the following nine members:

(I) Six authorized agents appointed by the executive director of the department of revenue based on recommendations of an association representing authorized agents, which agents have the following qualifications:

Two authorized agents from a category I or category II county as established in section 30-2-102 (1)(a) and (1)(b);

Two authorized agents from a category III or category IV county as established in section 30-2-102 (1)(c) and (1)(d);

Two authorized agents from a category V or category VI county as established in section 30-2-102 (1)(e) and (1)(f);

(II) Two employees of the department of revenue, appointed by the executive director of the department of revenue; and

Notwithstanding subsections (4)(a)(I)(A) to (4)(a)(I)(C) of this section, the executive director of the department of revenue may appoint, at the discretion of the executive director, an authorized agent to represent a category of county that the authorized agent is not from if an authorized agent from that category of county is not recommended or available for appointment or for other reasons as determined by the executive director.

An act of the committee is void unless a majority of the appointed members has voted in favor of the act.

The committee has the following powers and duties:

To approve the annual operation budget proposal for the appropriations for the following categories of Colorado DRIVES:

Personal services;

Operating expenses;

County office asset maintenance; and

County office improvements;

To fix the time when and place where meetings are held; and

To establish subcommittees and working groups to report to the committee.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2001, p. 815

, § 3, effective July 1, 2001.)

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2108, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

IP(1) and (4)(a) amended, p. 182, § 1, effective April 8.

L. 2001:

(1)(b) amended, p. 516, § 3, effective May 18; (8) added, p. 521, § 2, effective May 22; IP(1), (2), IP(4)(a), (4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(II), (5), and (7) amended, p. 815, § 3, effective July 1; (1)(b) and IP(4)(a) amended, p. 270, § 19, effective November 15; (4)(b) repealed, p. 516, § 4, effective January 1, 2002.

L. 2002:

(1.5) added, p. 1642, § 38, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

(1.5)(a) amended and (1.5)(c) added, p. 2080, § 17, effective May 22; (2) amended, p. 1979, § 6, effective May 22; IP(4)(a) amended, p. 563, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1.5)(c) amended, p. 18, § 3, effective July 1; (2) amended, p. 1172, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(1.5)(a) amended, (HB 09-1160), ch. 263, p. 1208, § 3, effective May 15.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (SB 10-055), ch. 152, p. 526, § 1, effective April 21; (1.7) added, (HB 10-1045), ch. 317, p. 1478, § 2, effective July 1, 2011.

L. 2012:

(1.9) added, (HB 12-1274), ch. 214, p. 924, § 11, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1542, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-176), ch. 12, p. 36, § 1, effective March 1; (1), (1.9)(b), and (2) amended and (1.5), (1.7), and (3) repealed, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 360, § 4, effective August 9; (1.9)(a) amended, (SB 17-132), ch. 207, p. 808, § 6, effective July 1, 2018 (see (4)(b) of the editor's note); (4)(a) amended, (4)(b) RC&RE, and (4)(c) and (4)(d) added, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 363, § 5, effective July 1, 2018; (5)(b) and (6)(b) added by revision, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, pp. 363, 377, §§ 5, 36.

L. 2018:

(2)(a) and (2)(b)(II) amended, (SB 18-253), ch. 293, p. 1798, § 1, effective May 29.

42-1-212. Consolidated data processing system - voter registration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2110, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2001:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, p. 816, § 4, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 516, § 5, effective January 1, 2002.

42-1-213. Commission of authorized agents.

Authorized agents may retain fifty cents out of the money collected by them on each transaction in which specific ownership tax is collected, which fifty cents is the only remuneration an authorized agent is allowed to retain for collecting specific ownership taxes and issuing receipts. In counties of the fifth class, the authorized agent shall use the retained funds to defray the necessary expenses in connection with the collection and administration of specific ownership taxes as directed by articles 1 to 4 of this title 42. Authorized agents in all other counties above the fifth class shall deposit in the general fund of said city and county, or of said county, all such sums so retained under this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2111, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 563, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 364, § 6, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-1-211 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-1-213 was relocated to § 42-1-215.

42-1-214. Duties of authorized agents.

Every authorized agent, on or before the fifteenth day of each calendar month, shall transmit to the department all fees and money collected by the agent under articles 1 to 4 (except part 3 of article 2) of this title 42 during the preceding calendar month, except such sums as are specifically authorized to be retained by the authorized agent.

The authorized agents shall deposit all money received in the administration of any motor vehicle license law with the county treasurers of their respective counties and take a receipt. The authorized agent shall deposit the money in a separate fund administered by the county treasurers, and the authorized agents are not liable for the safekeeping of the funds after depositing them. The county treasurers shall accept all money tendered to them by the authorized agents for deposit as provided in this section.

On or before the fifteenth day of each calendar month, the county treasurer shall send the money collected for the department by the authorized agent to the department by:

An electronic funds transfer covering the funds that have been deposited with the county treasurer during the previous month; or

A warrant drawn on the county treasurer of their county, payable to the department on demand, covering the amount of the funds that may have been deposited with the county treasurer during the previous month, and the county treasurer shall pay the warrant on demand and presentation.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2111, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 365, § 7, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-1-212 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-1-214 was relocated to § 42-1-216.

42-1-215. Oaths.

The executive director of the department, the deputy director of the department, the supervisor, and the authorized agents of the department are empowered to administer oaths or affirmations as provided in articles 1 to 4 of this title.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2112, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-1-213 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-1-215 was relocated to § 42-1-217.

42-1-216. Destruction of obsolete records.

The department is empowered to destroy or otherwise dispose of all obsolete motor and other vehicle records, number plates, and badges after the same have been in its possession for twelve calendar months; but all records of accidents must be preserved by the department for a period of six years.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2112, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-1-214 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-1-217. Disposition of fines and surcharges.

All judges, clerks of a court of record, or other officers imposing or receiving fines, penalties, or forfeitures, except those moneys received pursuant to sections 42-4-313 (3), 42-4-413, 42-4-1409, 42-4-1701 (5)(a), 42-8-105, and 42-8-106, collected pursuant to or as a result of a conviction of any persons for a violation of articles 1 to 4 (except part 3 of article 2) of this title, shall transmit, within ten days after the date of receipt of any such fine, penalty, or forfeiture, all such moneys so collected in the following manner:

The aggregate amount of such fines, penalties, or forfeitures, except for a violation of section 42-4-1301 or 42-4-237, shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, credited to the highway users tax fund, and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.

Fifty percent of any fine, penalty, or forfeiture for a violation of section 42-4-1301 occurring within the corporate limits of a city or town shall be transmitted to the treasurer or chief financial officer of said city or town, and the remaining fifty percent shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, credited to the highway users tax fund, and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.; except that twenty-five percent of any fine, penalty, or forfeiture for a violation of section 42-4-1301 occurring on a state or federal highway shall be transmitted to the treasurer or chief financial officer of said city or town, and the remaining seventy-five percent shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, credited to the highway users tax fund, and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.

Any other provision of law notwithstanding, all moneys collected pursuant to section 42-4-1301.3 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the account of the alcohol and drug driving safety program fund.

Fifty percent of any fine, penalty, or forfeiture for a violation of section 42-4-1301 occurring outside the corporate limits of a city or town shall be transmitted to the treasurer of the county in which the city or town is located, and the remaining fifty percent shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, credited to the highway users tax fund, and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.; except that twenty-five percent of any fine, penalty, or forfeiture for a violation of section 42-4-1301 occurring on a state or federal highway shall be transmitted to the treasurer of the county in which the city or town is located, and the remaining seventy-five percent shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, credited to the highway users tax fund, and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.

Any fine, penalty, or forfeiture collected for a violation of section 42-4-237 shall be transmitted to the treasurer of the local jurisdiction in which the violation occurred; except that:

If the citing officer was an officer of the Colorado state patrol, the fine, penalty, or forfeiture shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, credited to the highway users tax fund, and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.; or

If the violation occurred on a state or federal highway, fifty percent of the fine, penalty, or forfeiture shall be transmitted to the treasurer of the local jurisdiction in which the violation occurred and the remaining fifty percent shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, credited to the highway users tax fund, and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.

Except for the first fifty cents of any penalty for a traffic infraction, which shall be retained by the department and used for administrative purposes, moneys collected by the department pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (5)(a) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.; except that moneys collected pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (5)(a) for a violation of section 42-4-237 shall be allocated pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section.

Failure, refusal, or neglect on the part of any judicial or other officer or employee to comply with the provisions of this section shall constitute misconduct in office and shall be grounds for removal therefrom.

All moneys collected by the department as surcharges on penalty assessments issued for violations of a class A or a class B traffic infraction or a class 1 or a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense, pursuant to section 42-4-1701, shall be transmitted to the court administrator of the judicial district in which the offense or infraction was committed and credited fifty percent to the victims and witnesses assistance and law enforcement fund established in that judicial district and fifty percent to the crime victim compensation fund established in that judicial district.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2112, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended, p. 385, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 2002:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1921, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1550, § 9, effective May 1; (1)(c) amended, p. 2003, § 71, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

IP(1) amended, p. 792, § 1, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2005:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (2) amended, p. 141, § 6, effective April 5.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 1114, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

IP(1), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (2) amended, p. 2085, § 2, effective July 1.

42-1-218. Revocations and suspensions of licenses published. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2113, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2007:

Entire section repealed, p. 30, § 4, effective August 3.

42-1-218.5. Electronic hearings.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, at the discretion of the department, any hearing held by the department pursuant to this title may be conducted in whole or in part, in real time, by telephone or other electronic means.

The general assembly recognizes that there is an increase in the number of hearings conducted by the department; that a licensee has the right to appear in person at a hearing; and that a licensee or a law enforcement officer may not be able to appear in person at a hearing. The general assembly therefore directs the department to consider the circumstances of the licensee when a licensee requests to appear in person, and grant the request whenever possible. The general assembly further directs the department to consider the circumstances of the licensee and the law enforcement officer when either may not be able to appear in person, and allow the appearance by electronic means whenever possible.

and (4) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 552, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(3) and (4) repealed, p. 2620, § 2, effective June 5.

42-1-219. Appropriations for administration of title.

The general assembly shall make appropriations for the expenses of administration of this title.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2113, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-1-218 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-1-220. Identification security fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 940, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 535, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2006:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 656, § 2, effective April 24.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-025), ch. 266, p. 1215, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended and (2) repealed, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1542, § 4, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2014. (See

L. 2009, p. 1215

.)

42-1-221. Fuel piracy computer reprogramming cash fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1132, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2003. (See

L. 2002, p. 1132

.)

42-1-222. Motor vehicle investigations unit.

The department shall establish a motor vehicle investigations unit to investigate and prevent fraud concerning the use of driver's licenses, identification cards, motor vehicle titles and registrations, and other motor vehicle documents issued by the department. Such unit shall also assist victims of identity theft by means of such documents.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1736, § 1, effective July 1.

42-1-223. Monitoring driving improvement schools - fund - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1246), ch. 346, p. 1811, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(1) to (3) repealed and (4) and (5) added, (HB 14-1228), ch. 337, p. 1501, § 1, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2015. (See

L. 2014, p. 1501

.)